District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.73

Merger or consolidation — Rights of dissenting shareholders.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 210, ch. 269, § 73
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(aa), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-101.73.
1981 Ed., § 29-373.
1973 Ed., § 29-927i.

Prior Codifications